da: Håndtagsforbindelsestype: Kliklås; Skrue og vingemøtrik; Snap-on; Konisk pushfit; Gevind; Universel adapter; Andet
nl: Type steelverbinding: Klikvergrendeling; Schroef en vleugelmoer; Opklikbaar; Taps toelopende push-fit; Schroefdraad; Universele adapter; Overig
nb: Håndtakstilkoblingstype: Klikklås; Skrue og vingemutter; Snap-on; Konisk trykkpassning; Gjenget; Universell adapter; Annet
ko: 손잡이 연결 방식: 클릭 잠금; 스크류/윙 너트; 스냅온; 테이퍼형 푸시핏; 스레디드; 범용 어댑터; 기타
hu: Markolat csatlakozásának típusa: Kattintásos zár; Csavar és szárnyas anya; Felpattintható; Kúpos, tolóillesztéses; Menetes; Univerzális adapter; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de conexão da alça: Trava de clique; Parafuso e porca borboleta; Por encaixe; Encaixe cônico; Rosqueado; Adaptador universal; Outro
en: Handle connection type: Click-lock; Screw & wing nut; Snap-on; Tapered push-fit; Threaded; Universal adapter; Other
es: Tipo de conexión de asa: Bloqueo con clic; Tornillo y tuerca de mariposa; Encajable; Ajuste a presión cónico; Roscada; Adaptador universal; Otros
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης λαβής: Κλείδωμα με κλικ; Βίδα & παξιμάδι πεταλούδας; Κουμπωτή; Κωνική εφαρμογή push-fit; Με σπείρωμα; Καθολικός προσαρμογέας; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de encaixe da pega: Bloqueio de clique; Parafuso e porca borboleta; De encaixe; Encaixe cónico; Roscado; Adaptador universal; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta priključka ročaja: Zaklepanje s klikom; Vijak in krilna matica; Zaskočno; Zoženi potisni prileg; Navojna; Univerzalni adapter; Druga
fi: Kahvan liitäntätyyppi: Napsauttamalla lukittava; Ruuvi ja siipimutteri; Napsautettava; Kartiomainen työntösovite; Kierteellinen; Yleissovitin; Muu
th: ประเภทการเชื่อมต่อด้ามจับ: ระบบล็อกแบบคลิก; สกรูและน็อตปีกผีเสื้อ; Snap-on; แบบเสียบอัดปลายเรียว; เกลียว; อะแดปเตอร์แบบสากล; อื่นๆ
ja: ハンドル接続タイプ: クリックロック; ネジと蝶ナット; スナップオン; テーパードプッシュフィット; ねじ込み; ユニバーサルアダプター; その他
tr: Sap bağlantı tipi: Klik kilit; Vida ve kelebek somun; Geçmeli; Konik bastırmalı geçme; Dişli; Evrensel adaptör; Diğer
sv: Typ av handtagskoppling: Klicklås; Skruv och vingmutter; Snäpplock; Avsmalnande tryckpassning; Gängad; Universell adapter; Övrigt
ru: Тип крепления ручки: Замок с защелкой; Винт и гайка-барашек; Защелкивающееся; Коническое соединение; Резьбовое; Универсальный адаптер; Другой
vi: Loại kết nối tay cầm: Khóa khớp; Vít và đai ốc tai hồng; Lắp vào; Khớp nối ấn dạng côn; Có ren; Bộ chuyển đổi vạn năng; Khác
zh-TW: 手柄連接類型: 卡扣式; 螺絲和蝶帽; 扣環式; 錐形推入式; 螺紋式; 通用轉接器; 其他
it: Tipo di attacco del manico: Blocco a scatto; Vite e dado ad alette; A scatto; Conico a innesto; Filettato; Adattatore universale; Altro
bg-BG: Тип на свързване на дръжката: Заключване с щракване; Винт и крилчата гайка; Закопчаване; Конично прилягане; С резба; Универсален адаптер; Друго
pl: Typ podłączenia uchwytu: System click-lock; Śruba z nakrętką motylkową; Na zatrzask; Stożkowe wciskane; Gwintowane; Adapter uniwersalny; Pozostałe
cs: Typ připojení rukojeti: Zacvakávací; Šroub a křídlová matice; Zacvakávací; Zúžený zásuvný spoj; Šroubovací; Univerzální adaptér; Jiné
ro-RO: Tip de conexiune a mânerului: Blocare prin click; Șurub și piuliță fluture; Fixare prin apăsare; Potrivire prin împingere conică; Filetat; Adaptor universal; Altele
zh-CN: 手柄连接类型: 卡扣锁定式; 螺钉和蝶形螺母; 按扣式; 锥形推入式; 螺纹式; 通用适配器; 其他
fr: Type de fixation du manche: Verrouillage par clic; Vis et écrou papillon; Cutters; Embout conique; Fileté; Adaptateur universel; Autre
sk-SK: Typ pripojenia rúčky: Zacvakávací mechanizmus; Skrutka a krídlová matica; Pripínací; Kónické zasúvací spoj; Závitový; Univerzálny adaptér; Iné
de: Befestigungsart des Stiels: Klickverriegelung; Schraube und Flügelmutter; Schnappdeckel; Konische Steckverbindung; Mit Gewinde; Universaladapter; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Rankenos tvirtinimo tipas: Spragtelėjimo užraktas; Varžtas ir sparno veržlė; Užspaudžiamas; Kūginis įspaudžiamas įdėklas; Srieginis; Universalus adapteris; Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta povezivanja ručke: Spajanje na klik; Vijak i krilna matica; Pričvršćivanje; Konično potisno spajanje; Navojna; Univerzalni adapter; Ostalo